Oklahoma, session 2025, SB466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 180.62, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 394, O.S.L. 2024 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 180.62), is amended to read as follows:


Section 180.62. A. The basic salaries of county officers upon


which all salaries and future increases or decreases thereof shall


not be less than Nineteen Thousand Dollars ($19,000.00) per annum


nor shall they exceed Forty-nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($49,500.00) Seventy-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($74,500.00)


per annum, provided the basic salary for the sheriff, which shall be


no less than other salaries for county officers controlled by this


section, shall not be less than Forty-four Thousand Dollars

Req. No. 800 Page 1


($44,000.00) per annum nor shall it exceed Seventy-four Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($74,500.00) per annum.


B. The board of county commissioners, or if the county has


elected to come under the County Budget Act, the county budget board


members of the county, shall set the salaries for all elected county


officials within the limits allowed by law.


C. The annual salaries fixed by this act Section 180.58 et seq.


of this title shall be paid either monthly or twice a month, by


order of the board of county commissioners, for each month or


fraction thereof the incumbent lawfully occupies and holds title to


such office.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-800 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:36:56 AM





















Req. No. 800 Page 2